District of Columbia statutes.
2-307.02

Repealed

Proceeds from disposal of surplus goods.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 702, 32 DCR 7396
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 1039(b), 52 DCR 7503
1981 Ed., § 1-1187.2.
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 1039(b) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).